Tennessee statutes. Title 41 Correctional Institutions and Inmates
Part 3

Road Work by Jail Inmates

41-22-301. Contracting board.

The county mayor, county clerk and sheriff of each county are constituted a board for their respective counties, whose duty it is to enter into contracts with public road commissioners or other officers or road contractors having the superintendence of working the public roads, for the employment on the public roads of inmates confined in the county jails for the nonpayment of fines and/or costs adjudged against them by the courts.

Acts 1899, ch. 358, § 1; Shan., § 1682a1; mod. Code 1932, § 2814; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1301; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Provisions of this section concerning imprisonment for failure to pay costs may be affected by Anderson v. Ellington, 300 F. Supp. 789 (M.D. Tenn. 1969), which held that imprisonment for nonpayment of costs violates the United States Constitution.

Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Contracts between county officials and department of transportation, § 41-2-125.

Felons sentenced to workhouse, § 41-2-123.

Inmate labor for private purposes, §§ 41-2-148, 41-3-106.

Portable workhouses for road work, § 41-2-101.

41-22-302. Contracts without delay.

The contracts are to be made without delay when an inmate is confined in the county jail. It is made the duty of those having the superintendence of the working of the public roads, or road contractors, to enter into contracts immediately with the board named in § 41-22-301 for the employment of the inmates.

Acts 1899, ch. 358, § 1; Shan., § 1682a2; Code 1932, § 2815; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1302.

41-22-303. Guarding of work parties.

The contract shall be made according to the following provisions and restrictions:

It is the duty of the sheriff of the county to select a guard for the inmates to guard them from the time they are removed from the county jail to be put to work until returned;

It is the duty of the county legislative body to furnish the guard with picks to be placed on each inmate during the time of their removal from the county jail and employment on the public roads, to prevent them under any circumstances from escaping, and the guard shall be responsible for the safe return of the inmates to the county jail; and

While guarding the inmates, the guard shall be clothed with the same authority, and the guard's duties and powers shall be the same, as pertain to sheriffs in the guarding of inmates.

Acts 1899, ch. 358, § 2; Shan., § 1682a3; Code 1932, § 2816; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1303.

41-22-304. Work day — Amount credited against fines and costs.

Inmates shall be worked on any of the public roads of the county. The same number of hours of labor per day as is required by the public road laws shall constitute a day's work. An inmate shall be allowed one dollar ($1.00) for each day's work, which amount shall be credited to the inmate's fine and costs.

Acts 1899, ch. 358, § 3; Shan., § 1682a4; Code 1932, § 2817; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1304.

41-22-305. Punishment for refusal to work.

Any inmate refusing to work shall be fed only with one (1) meal per day until willing to render good service as a laborer and proves it by doing good work.

Acts 1899, ch. 358, § 6; Shan., § 1682a9; Code 1932, § 2822; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1305.

41-22-306. Supervision.

Work shall be under the supervision of the guard having instructions from at least two (2) members of the board of employment on what road and places and how the guard shall have the work performed.

Acts 1899, ch. 358, § 3; Shan., § 1682a5; Code 1932, § 2818; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1306.

41-22-307. Compensation of guard.

The guard shall receive for services not exceeding one dollar ($1.00) per day for each day employed, or an amount not exceeding two dollars ($2.00) per day as the sheriff shall agree to pay. The county mayor, on the order of the county legislative body, shall draw a warrant on the county trustee, who shall pay the guard for services out of the county treasury.

The sheriff of the county, or any of the sheriff's deputies, may act as guard for the inmates while they are absent from the jail, or the sheriff shall appoint a good person to serve as guard for the inmates during that time.

Acts 1899, ch. 358, § 3; Shan., § 1682a6; mod. Code 1932, § 2819; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1307; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

41-22-308. Part supplemental to workhouse provisions.

This part shall not be construed to conflict with chapter 2 of this title, providing for the construction of workhouses in any county or declaring any county jail a workhouse, but shall be construed as supplementary to that chapter, and this part shall apply to such counties as are not actually working all of their inmates confined in the county jail for nonpayment of fines and costs adjudged against them or that may hereafter not be actually working the inmates according to chapter 2 of this title.

Acts 1899, ch. 358, § 4; Shan., § 1682a7; Code 1932, § 2820; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1308.

Compiler's Notes. Provisions of this section concerning imprisonment for failure to pay costs may be affected by Anderson v. Ellington , 300 F. Supp. 789 (M.D. Tenn. 1969), which held that imprisonment for nonpayment of costs violates the United States Constitution.

41-22-309. Counties acting jointly.

The county employment boards, created by this part, of any two (2) or more adjoining counties, when they deem it advisable, may combine the inmates of those counties and work them on the public roads of those counties, according to the rules and regulations provided in this part.

Acts 1899, ch. 358, § 5; Shan., § 1682a8; Code 1932, § 2821; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1309.